Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.091

Commercial pesticide applicator license—Persons who may apply under license authority.

(1) No commercial pesticide applicator shall allow a person to apply pesticides under the authority of the commercial pesticide applicator's license unless the commercial pesticide applicator has, by mail or facsimile transmissions, submitted the name to the department on a form prescribed by the department as provided in RCW 17.21.080(2). The department shall maintain a list for each commercial pesticide applicator of persons authorized to apply pesticides under the authority of the commercial pesticide applicator's license.

(2) Violations of this chapter by a person acting as an employee, agent, or otherwise acting on behalf of or under the license authority of a commercial pesticide applicator, may, in the discretion of the department, be treated as a violation by the commercial pesticide applicator.

[ 1994 c 283 s 8.]